California, session 20252026, SB848.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 10 (commencing with Section 32100) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 19 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, to read: Article 10. Professional Boundaries Between Adults and Pupils and the Safety of Learning Environments32100. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts, schools operated by county offices of education, charter schools, private schools, and state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department be safe and nurturing places for pupils that are free of fear and threats of violence and free of violent crimes and sexual offenses committed by, or intended to be committed by, other pupils, school employees, volunteers, and contractors.(b) On or before July 1, 2026, each governing board of a school district, county board of education, and governing body of a charter school or private school, and the department, for purposes of state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, shall do both of the following: (1) Adopt written policies that promote safe environments for pupil learning and engagement, consistent with the legislative intent specified in subdivision (a), and that do both of the following:(A) Explicitly address professional boundaries (i) between pupils and school employees, adult volunteers, and school contractors, (ii) among and between pupils, and (iii) among and between adults employed, volunteering, or under contract.(B) Establish appropriate limits on contact during or outside of the schoolday between pupils and school employees, volunteers, and school contractors via social media internet platforms, text messaging, and other forms of communication that do not otherwise include the pupil’s parent or guardian. The policies may vary the limitations based on the age or grade of the pupil.(2) Adopt written policies, plans, or specifications regarding school facilities, and the furnishing of school facilities, that address classroom and nonclassroom environments to promote safe environments for learning and engagement that are easily supervised.(c) School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools are encouraged to work with their public entity risk pool joint powers authority or insurance provider to identify and adopt best practices known to prevent violent crimes, injury, sex offenses, and egregious misconduct.(d) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(1) “Sex offense” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44010.(2) “Small school district” means a school district that has fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance at the beginning of each fiscal year.(3) “Violent crime” has the same meaning as defined in Section 32281.SEC. 2. Section 32280 of the Education Code is amended to read:32280. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all California public schools teaching kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, operated by a school district, in cooperation with local law enforcement agencies, community leaders, parents, pupils, teachers, administrators, classified employees, local emergency medical services personnel, the school’s public entity risk pool joint powers authority or insurance provider, and other persons who may be interested in the health and safety of pupils and the prevention of campus crime and violence, develop a comprehensive school safety plan that addresses the safety concerns identified through a systematic planning process.(b) It is also the intent of the Legislature that all school staff be trained on the comprehensive school safety plan.(c) For the purposes of this section, law enforcement agencies include local police departments, county sheriffs’ offices, school district police or security departments, probation departments, and district attorneys’ offices.(d) For purposes of this section, a “safety plan” means a plan to develop strategies aimed at the prevention of, response to, and education about, potential incidents involving medical emergencies, including sudden cardiac arrest, and crime and violence on the school campus.SEC. 3. Section 32281 of the Education Code is amended to read:32281. (a) Each school district and county office of education is responsible for the overall development of all comprehensive school safety plans for its schools operating kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) with regard to a small school district, the schoolsite council established pursuant to former Section 52012, as it existed before July 1, 2005, or Section 52852 shall write and develop a comprehensive school safety plan relevant to the needs and resources of that particular school.(2) The schoolsite council may delegate this responsibility to a school safety planning committee made up of the following members:(A) The principal or the principal’s designee.(B) One teacher who is a representative of the recognized certificated employee organization.(C) One parent whose child attends the school.(D) One classified employee who is a representative of the recognized classified employee organization.(E) Other members, if desired.(3) The schoolsite council shall consult with a representative from a law enforcement agency, a fire department, and other first responder entities in the writing and development of the comprehensive school safety plan. The comprehensive school safety plan and any updates to the plan shall be shared with the law enforcement agency, the fire department, and the other first responder entities.(4) In the absence of a schoolsite council, the members specified in paragraph (2) shall serve as the school safety planning committee.(c) This article does not limit or take away the authority of school boards as guaranteed under this code.(d) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to a small school district if the small school district develops a districtwide comprehensive school safety plan that is applicable to each schoolsite.(e) (1) When a principal or their designee verifies through local law enforcement officials that a report has been filed of the occurrence of a violent crime or sex offense on the schoolsite of an elementary or secondary school at which they are the principal, the principal or the principal’s designee may send to each pupil’s parent or legal guardian and each school employee a written notice of the occurrence and general nature of the crime. If the principal or their designee chooses to send the written notice, the Legislature encourages the notice be sent no later than the end of business on the second regular workday after the verification. If, at the time of verification, local law enforcement officials determine that notification of the violent crime or sex offense would hinder an ongoing investigation, the notification authorized by this subdivision shall be made within a reasonable period of time, to be determined by the local law enforcement agency and the school district.(2) This subdivision does not create any liability in a school district or their employees for complying with paragraph (1).(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a school district or county office of education may, in consultation with law enforcement officials, elect to not have its schoolsite council develop and write those portions of its comprehensive school safety plan that include tactical responses to criminal incidents that may result in death or serious bodily injury at the schoolsite. The portions of a comprehensive school safety plan that include tactical responses to criminal incidents may be developed by administrators of the school district or county office of education in consultation with law enforcement officials and with a representative of an exclusive bargaining unit of employees of that school district or county office of education, if the representative chooses to participate. The school district or county office of education may elect not to disclose those portions of the comprehensive school safety plan that include tactical responses to criminal incidents.(2) As used in this article, “tactical responses to criminal incidents” means steps taken to safeguard pupils and staff, to secure the affected school premises, and to apprehend the criminal perpetrator or perpetrators.(3) This subdivision does not preclude the governing board of a school district or county office of education from conferring in a closed session with law enforcement officials pursuant to Section 54957 of the Government Code to approve a tactical response plan developed in consultation with those officials pursuant to this subdivision. Any vote to approve the tactical response plan shall be announced in open session following the closed session.(4) This subdivision does not reduce or eliminate the requirements of Section 32282.(g) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(1) “Child abuse or neglect” has the same meaning as defined in Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code.(2) “Sex offense” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44010.(3) “Small school district” means a school district that has fewer than 2,501 units of average daily attendance at the beginning of each fiscal year.(4) “Violent crime” means any of the following:(A) An act defined or described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (i) of Section 67381 and that is an act for which a pupil could or would be expelled pursuant to Section 48915.(B) A violent felony pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.(C) A serious felony pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.SEC. 4. Section 32282 of the Education Code is amended to read:32282. (a) The comprehensive school safety plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Assessing the current status of crime committed on school campuses and at school-related functions.(2) Identifying appropriate strategies and programs that will provide or maintain a high level of school safety and address the school’s procedures for complying with existing laws related to school safety, which shall include the development of all of the following:(A) (i) Child abuse or neglect reporting procedures consistent with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.(ii) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated, or by no later than July 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to address the supervision and protection of children from child abuse or neglect or sex offenses.(B) (i) Disaster procedures, routine and emergency, including adaptations for pupils with disabilities in accordance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)). The disaster procedures shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(I) Establishing an earthquake emergency procedure system in every public school building having an occupant capacity of 50 or more pupils or more than one classroom. A school district or county office of education may work with the Office of Emergency Services and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission to develop and establish the earthquake emergency procedure system. The system shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(ia) A school building disaster plan, ready for implementation at any time, for maintaining the safety and care of pupils and staff. The department shall provide general direction to school districts and county offices of education on what to include in the school building disaster plan.(ib) A drop procedure whereby each pupil and staff member takes cover under a table or desk, dropping to their knees, with the head protected by the arms, and the back to the windows. A drop procedure practice shall be held at least once a school quarter in elementary schools and at least once a semester in secondary schools.(ic) Protective measures to be taken before, during, and following an earthquake.(id) A program to ensure that pupils and both the certificated and classified staff are aware of, and properly trained in, the earthquake emergency procedure system.(II) Establishing a procedure to allow a public agency, including the American Red Cross, to use school buildings, grounds, and equipment for mass care and welfare shelters during disasters or other emergencies affecting the public health and welfare. The school district or county office of education shall cooperate with the public agency in furnishing and maintaining the services as the school district or county office of education may deem necessary to meet the needs of the community.(III) (ia) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, establishing a procedure to identify appropriate refuge shelter for all pupils and staff to be used in the event of an evacuation order by local authorities and notify the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries of this identified refuge, in order to first prioritize the safety of pupils and staff, and then the defense of that structure in the event of a fire. Each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, shall coordinate the procedure with the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries. For those schools under the jurisdiction of a school district or county office of education, the school district or county office of education shall be the entity that coordinates with the operational area having jurisdiction within each of the school’s boundaries.(ib) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the development by each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, of a communication and evacuation plan, to be used in the event of an early notice evacuation warning, that allows enough time to evacuate all pupils and staff. These plans shall clearly identify a decision process to determine whether an evacuation order is appropriate.(ic) For purposes of this subclause, “operational area” means an intermediate level of the state emergency services organization, consisting of a county and all political subdivisions within the county area, that serves as a link in the system of communication and coordination between the state’s emergency operation centers and the operating centers of the political subdivisions that make up the operational area, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 8559 of the Government Code and Section 8605 of the Government Code.(ii) The evaluation of a comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) and the review of a school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable, shall include ensuring that the plan includes appropriate adaptations for pupils with disabilities, as required pursuant to clause (i).(iii) (I) After the first evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted, and after each annual evaluation or review thereafter, a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves may bring concerns about an individual pupil’s ability to access disaster safety procedures described in the comprehensive school safety plan or the school safety plan to the school principal. If the school principal determines there is merit to a concern, the principal shall direct the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, to make appropriate modifications to the comprehensive school safety plan or school safety plan, as applicable, during the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable. The school principal may direct the schoolsite council, the school safety planning committee, or the charter school, as applicable, to make such modifications before the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable.(II) Subclause (I) does not prohibit a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves from bringing their concerns to the school principal before an evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted.(iv) All deliberations of the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, related to individual pupils with disabilities for purposes of the requirements of clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, shall be subject to applicable state and federal laws regarding the privacy of pupil information.(C) Policies pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915 for pupils who committed an act listed in subdivision (c) of Section 48915 and other school-designated serious acts that would lead to suspension, expulsion, or mandatory expulsion recommendations pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 48900) of Chapter 6 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.(D) Procedures to notify teachers of dangerous pupils pursuant to Section 49079.(E) A discrimination and harassment policy consistent with the prohibition against discrimination contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1.(F) The provisions of any schoolwide dress code, pursuant to Section 35183, that prohibits pupils from wearing “gang-related apparel,” if the school has adopted that type of a dress code. For those purposes, the comprehensive school safety plan shall define “gang-related apparel.” The definition shall be limited to apparel that, if worn or displayed on a school campus, reasonably could be determined to threaten the health and safety of the school environment. A schoolwide dress code established pursuant to this section and Section 35183 shall be enforced on the school campus and at any school-sponsored activity by the principal of the school or the person designated by the principal. For purposes of this subparagraph, “gang-related apparel” shall not be considered a protected form of speech pursuant to Section 48950.(G) Procedures for safe ingress and egress of pupils, parents, and school employees to and from school.(H) A safe and orderly environment conducive to learning at the school.(I) The rules and procedures on school discipline adopted pursuant to Sections 35291, 35291.5, 47605, and 47605.6.(J) Procedures for conducting tactical responses to criminal incidents, including procedures related to individuals with guns on school campuses and at school-related functions. The procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants shall be based on the specific needs and context of each school and community.(K) If a comprehensive school safety plan includes procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants by conducting a drill, a school shall comply with all of the following relating to the drill:(i) (I) The school shall not conduct a high-intensity drill.(II) For purposes of this clause, “high-intensity drill” means a drill that includes simulations that mimic an actual school shooter or other armed assailant incident, including, but not limited to, theatrical makeup or other materials to give an image of blood or gunshot wounds, acting by an individual posing to be the assailant, acting by individuals posing as victims, or simulations that instruct pupils to actively resist an assailant by throwing objects, attacking, or swarming the assailant.(ii) The school shall not include the use of real weapons, gunfire blanks, or explosions in the conducting of the drill.(iii) The school shall ensure a trauma-informed approach to the design and execution of any drill, which shall include all of the following:(I) Age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate drill content and terminology developed with the involvement of school personnel, including school-based mental health professionals.(II) Notice to all parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel subject to the drills in advance of the drill and of the drill’s expected length of time.(III) The ability for parents or guardians to opt their child or children out of the drills.(IV) An announcement to pupils and educators immediately before the start of the drills and an announcement to pupils and educators immediately after the drills have concluded.(V) A notice to all parents and guardians after the drill has concluded.(VI) The provision of contact information for community-based resources, including local organizations with objectives to reduce gun violence or provide mental health counseling, to parents or guardians, pupils, and staff who are negatively impacted by the drills, and, where available, prioritizing school-based resources.(L) Procedures to assess and respond to reports of any dangerous, violent, or unlawful activity that is being conducted or threatened to be conducted at the school, at an activity sponsored by the school, or on a schoolbus serving the school.(M) (i) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated on or after July 1, 2025, procedures to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing a sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening medical emergency while on school grounds.(ii) The procedures described in clause (i) are encouraged to integrate evidence-based core elements, including any cardiopulmonary resuscitation training offered and the placement of any automated external defibrillator available on the schoolsite in accordance with nationally recognized evidence-based emergency cardiac care guidelines, as dictated by the school safety plan.(N) For schools that serve pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, a protocol in the event a pupil is suffering or is reasonably believed to be suffering from an opioid overdose.(3) (A) Beginning July 1, 2025, an instructional continuity plan to establish communication with pupils and their families and provide instruction to pupils when in-person instruction is disrupted due to an emergency pursuant to Section 41422 or subdivision (a) of Section 46392. The plan shall include all the following:(i) Procedures for pupil engagement, as soon as practicable, and no later than five calendar days following the emergency. Procedures shall be designed to establish two-way communication with pupils and their families and identify and provide supports for pupils’ social-emotional, mental health, and academic needs.(ii) A plan to provide access to in-person instruction or remote instruction pursuant to Sections 51747 and 51749.5, as soon as practicable, but no later than 10 instructional days following the emergency. The plan may include support to pupils and families to enroll in or be temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school.(B) Local educational agencies are encouraged to plan to meet instructional standards that are at least equivalent to those applicable to independent study programs.(C) (i) For purposes of this paragraph, “temporarily reassigned” means temporarily reassigned to another local educational agency outside of the school district, but within the county or an immediately adjacent county, in which the pupil’s parent or guardian resides. Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a pupil who is temporarily reassigned shall be deemed to have complied with the residency requirements for attendance in the local educational agency that is temporarily serving the pupil pursuant to this section.(ii) Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a school district, county office of education, or charter school may continue to enroll a pupil who is temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school pursuant to this section in order to facilitate the timely reentry of the pupil in their prior school after the emergency event has ended.(D) This paragraph applies to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that schools develop comprehensive school safety plans using existing resources, including the materials and services of the partnership, pursuant to this chapter. It is also the intent of the Legislature that schools use the handbook developed and distributed in partnership by the department’s Safe Schools and Violence Prevention Center and the Attorney General’s Crime and Violence Prevention Center entitled “Safe Schools: A Planning Guide for Action” in conjunction with developing their plan for school safety.(c) Each schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, in developing and updating a comprehensive school safety plan, shall, where practical, consult, cooperate, and coordinate with other schoolsite councils or school safety planning committees.(d) The comprehensive school safety plan may be evaluated and amended, as needed, by the school safety planning committee, but shall be evaluated at least once a year, to ensure that the comprehensive school safety plan is properly implemented. An updated file of all safety-related plans and materials shall be readily available for inspection by the public.(e) As comprehensive school safety plans are reviewed and updated, the Legislature encourages all plans, to the extent that resources are available, to include policies and procedures aimed at the prevention of bullying.(f) The comprehensive school safety plan, as written and updated by the schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, shall be submitted for approval pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32288.(g) The department shall maintain and conspicuously post on its internet website a compliance checklist for developing a comprehensive school safety plan, and shall update the checklist when necessary.(h) On or before March 1, 2025, the Superintendent shall develop and post on the department’s internet website instructional continuity plan guidance, including guidance for continued academic and school engagement strategies during disruptions in instruction due to emergencies.SEC. 4.5. Section 32282 of the Education Code is amended to read:32282. (a) The comprehensive school safety plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Assessing the current status of crime committed on school campuses and at school-related functions.(2) Identifying appropriate strategies and programs that will provide or maintain a high level of school safety and address the school’s procedures for complying with existing laws related to school safety, which shall include the development of all of the following:(A) (i) Child abuse or neglect reporting procedures consistent with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.(ii) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated, or by no later than July 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to address the supervision and protection of children from child abuse or neglect or sex offenses.(B) (i) Disaster procedures, routine and emergency, including adaptations for pupils with disabilities in accordance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)). The disaster procedures shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(I) Establishing an earthquake emergency procedure system in every public school building having an occupant capacity of 50 or more pupils or more than one classroom. A school district or county office of education may work with the Office of Emergency Services and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission to develop and establish the earthquake emergency procedure system. The system shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(ia) A school building disaster plan, ready for implementation at any time, for maintaining the safety and care of pupils and staff. The department shall provide general direction to school districts and county offices of education on what to include in the school building disaster plan.(ib) A drop procedure whereby each pupil and staff member takes cover under a table or desk, dropping to their knees, with the head protected by the arms, and the back to the windows. A drop procedure practice shall be held at least once a school quarter in elementary schools and at least once a semester in secondary schools.(ic) Protective measures to be taken before, during, and following an earthquake.(id) A program to ensure that pupils and both the certificated and classified staff are aware of, and properly trained in, the earthquake emergency procedure system.(II) Establishing a procedure to allow a public agency, including the American Red Cross, to use school buildings, grounds, and equipment for mass care and welfare shelters during disasters or other emergencies affecting the public health and welfare. The school district or county office of education shall cooperate with the public agency in furnishing and maintaining the services as the school district or county office of education may deem necessary to meet the needs of the community.(III) (ia) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, establishing a procedure to identify appropriate refuge shelter for all pupils and staff to be used in the event of an evacuation order by local authorities and notify the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries of this identified refuge, in order to first prioritize the safety of pupils and staff, and then the defense of that structure in the event of a fire. Each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, shall coordinate the procedure with the operational area having jurisdiction within the school’s boundaries. For those schools under the jurisdiction of a school district or county office of education, the school district or county office of education shall be the entity that coordinates with the operational area having jurisdiction within each of the school’s boundaries.(ib) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the development by each public school, including a charter school, serving more than 50 pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is in a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, identified pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code, of a communication and evacuation plan, to be used in the event of an early notice evacuation warning, that allows enough time to evacuate all pupils and staff. These plans shall clearly identify a decision process to determine whether an evacuation order is appropriate.(ic) For purposes of this subclause, “operational area” means an intermediate level of the state emergency services organization, consisting of a county and all political subdivisions within the county area, that serves as a link in the system of communication and coordination between the state’s emergency operation centers and the operating centers of the political subdivisions that make up the operational area, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 8559 of the Government Code and Section 8605 of the Government Code.(ii) The evaluation of a comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) and the review of a school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable, shall include ensuring that the plan includes appropriate adaptations for pupils with disabilities, as required pursuant to clause (i).(iii) (I) After the first evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted, and after each annual evaluation or review thereafter, a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves may bring concerns about an individual pupil’s ability to access disaster safety procedures described in the comprehensive school safety plan or the school safety plan to the school principal. If the school principal determines there is merit to a concern, the principal shall direct the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, to make appropriate modifications to the comprehensive school safety plan or school safety plan, as applicable, during the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable. The school principal may direct the schoolsite council, the school safety planning committee, or the charter school, as applicable, to make such modifications before the evaluation of the comprehensive school safety plan pursuant to subdivision (d) or the review of the school safety plan pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605 or clause (iii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, as applicable.(II) Subclause (I) does not prohibit a school employee, a pupil’s parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or a pupil themselves from bringing their concerns to the school principal before an evaluation or review, as applicable, for purposes of subdivision (d) and clause (ii) is conducted.(iv) All deliberations of the schoolsite council, school safety planning committee, or charter school, as applicable, related to individual pupils with disabilities for purposes of the requirements of clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, shall be subject to applicable state and federal laws regarding the privacy of pupil information.(C) Policies pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915 for pupils who committed an act listed in subdivision (c) of Section 48915 and other school-designated serious acts that would lead to suspension, expulsion, or mandatory expulsion recommendations pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 48900) of Chapter 6 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.(D) Procedures to notify teachers of dangerous pupils pursuant to Section 49079.(E) A discrimination and harassment policy consistent with the prohibition against discrimination contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1.(F) The provisions of any schoolwide dress code, pursuant to Section 35183, that prohibits pupils from wearing “gang-related apparel,” if the school has adopted that type of a dress code. For those purposes, the comprehensive school safety plan shall define “gang-related apparel.” The definition shall be limited to apparel that, if worn or displayed on a school campus, reasonably could be determined to threaten the health and safety of the school environment. A schoolwide dress code established pursuant to this section and Section 35183 shall be enforced on the school campus and at any school-sponsored activity by the principal of the school or the person designated by the principal. For purposes of this subparagraph, “gang-related apparel” shall not be considered a protected form of speech pursuant to Section 48950.(G) Procedures for safe ingress and egress of pupils, parents, and school employees to and from school.(H) A safe and orderly environment conducive to learning at the school.(I) The rules and procedures on school discipline adopted pursuant to Sections 35291, 35291.5, 47605, and 47605.6.(J) Procedures for conducting tactical responses to criminal incidents, including procedures related to individuals with guns on school campuses and at school-related functions. The procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants shall be based on the specific needs and context of each school and community.(K) If a comprehensive school safety plan includes procedures to prepare for active shooters or other armed assailants by conducting a drill, a school shall comply with all of the following relating to the drill:(i) (I) The school shall not conduct a high-intensity drill.(II) For purposes of this clause, “high-intensity drill” means a drill that includes simulations that mimic an actual school shooter or other armed assailant incident, including, but not limited to, theatrical makeup or other materials to give an image of blood or gunshot wounds, acting by an individual posing to be the assailant, acting by individuals posing as victims, or simulations that instruct pupils to actively resist an assailant by throwing objects, attacking, or swarming the assailant.(ii) The school shall not include the use of real weapons, gunfire blanks, or explosions in the conducting of the drill.(iii) The school shall ensure a trauma-informed approach to the design and execution of any drill, which shall include all of the following:(I) Age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate drill content and terminology developed with the involvement of school personnel, including school-based mental health professionals.(II) Notice to all parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel subject to the drills in advance of the drill and of the drill’s expected length of time.(III) The ability for parents or guardians to opt their child or children out of the drills.(IV) An announcement to pupils and educators immediately before the start of the drills and an announcement to pupils and educators immediately after the drills have concluded.(V) A notice to all parents and guardians after the drill has concluded.(VI) The provision of contact information for community-based resources, including local organizations with objectives to reduce gun violence or provide mental health counseling, to parents or guardians, pupils, and staff who are negatively impacted by the drills, and, where available, prioritizing school-based resources.(L) Procedures to assess and respond to reports of any dangerous, violent, or unlawful activity that is being conducted or threatened to be conducted at the school, at an activity sponsored by the school, or on a schoolbus serving the school.(M) (i) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated on or after July 1, 2025, procedures to respond to incidents involving an individual experiencing a sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening medical emergency while on school grounds.(ii) The procedures described in clause (i) are encouraged to integrate evidence-based core elements, including any cardiopulmonary resuscitation training offered and the placement of any automated external defibrillator available on the schoolsite in accordance with nationally recognized evidence-based emergency cardiac care guidelines, as dictated by the school safety plan.(N) (i) When a comprehensive school safety plan is next reviewed and updated, but by no later than March 1, 2026, procedures specifically designed to notify parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel when the school confirms the presence of immigration enforcement on the schoolsite.(ii) The content and timing of a notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) shall consider the safety and well-being of the pupils, employees, and community members of the schoolsite when determining when and how to issue the notification to parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel.(iii) The notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) may also include a hyperlink to additional resources for families with information about their educational rights, state laws that protects parents’ and students’ privacy and confidentiality, and, if available, counseling or support services, which may include services that support families impacted by immigration enforcement and model policies adopted by the local educational agency pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 234.7.(iv) A notification provided under the procedures in clause (i) shall not include any personally identifiable information.(v) For purposes of this subparagraph, “immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.(O) For schools that serve pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, a protocol in the event a pupil is suffering or is reasonably believed to be suffering from an opioid overdose.(3) (A) Beginning July 1, 2025, an instructional continuity plan to establish communication with pupils and their families and provide instruction to pupils when in-person instruction is disrupted due to an emergency pursuant to Section 41422 or subdivision (a) of Section 46392. The plan shall include all the following:(i) Procedures for pupil engagement, as soon as practicable, and no later than five calendar days following the emergency. Procedures shall be designed to establish two-way communication with pupils and their families and identify and provide supports for pupils’ social-emotional, mental health, and academic needs.(ii) A plan to provide access to in-person instruction or remote instruction pursuant to Sections 51747 and 51749.5, as soon as practicable, but no later than 10 instructional days following the emergency. The plan may include support to pupils and families to enroll in or be temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school.(B) Local educational agencies are encouraged to plan to meet instructional standards that are at least equivalent to those applicable to independent study programs.(C) (i) For purposes of this paragraph, “temporarily reassigned” means temporarily reassigned to another local educational agency outside of the school district, but within the county or an immediately adjacent county, in which the pupil’s parent or guardian resides. Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a pupil who is temporarily reassigned shall be deemed to have complied with the residency requirements for attendance in the local educational agency that is temporarily serving the pupil pursuant to this section.(ii) Notwithstanding Section 48200 or any other law, a school district, county office of education, or charter school may continue to enroll a pupil who is temporarily reassigned to another school district, county office of education, or charter school pursuant to this section in order to facilitate the timely reentry of the pupil in their prior school after the emergency event has ended.(D) This paragraph applies to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that schools develop comprehensive school safety plans using existing resources, including the materials and services of the partnership, pursuant to this chapter. It is also the intent of the Legislature that schools use the handbook developed and distributed in partnership by the department’s Safe Schools and Violence Prevention Center and the Attorney General’s Crime and Violence Prevention Center entitled “Safe Schools: A Planning Guide for Action” in conjunction with developing their plan for school safety.(c) Each schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, in developing and updating a comprehensive school safety plan, shall, where practical, consult, cooperate, and coordinate with other schoolsite councils or school safety planning committees.(d) The comprehensive school safety plan may be evaluated and amended, as needed, by the school safety planning committee, but shall be evaluated at least once a year, to ensure that the comprehensive school safety plan is properly implemented. An updated file of all safety-related plans and materials shall be readily available for inspection by the public.(e) As comprehensive school safety plans are reviewed and updated, the Legislature encourages all plans, to the extent that resources are available, to include policies and procedures aimed at the prevention of bullying.(f) The comprehensive school safety plan, as written and updated by the schoolsite council or school safety planning committee, shall be submitted for approval pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 32288.(g) The department shall maintain and conspicuously post on its internet website a compliance checklist for developing a comprehensive school safety plan, and shall update the checklist when necessary.(h) On or before March 1, 2025, the Superintendent shall develop and post on the department’s internet website instructional continuity plan guidance, including guidance for continued academic and school engagement strategies during disruptions in instruction due to emergencies.(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 44010 of the Education Code is amended to read:44010. “Sex offense,” as used in Sections 44020, 44237, 44346, 44425, 44436, 44836, and 45123, means any one or more of the offenses listed below:(a) An offense defined in Section 220, 261, 261.5, 288.2, 288.3, 288.4, subdivision (c) of Section 290, Section 311.2, 313.1, 647b, subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 647, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 647.6, of the Penal Code.(b) An offense defined in former subdivision (5) of former Section 647 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 560 of the Statutes of 1961, or any offense defined in former subdivision (2) of former Section 311 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 2147 of the Statutes of 1961, if the offense defined in those sections was committed before September 15, 1961, to the same extent that an offense committed before that date was a sex offense for the purposes of this section before September 15, 1961.(c) An offense defined in Section 314 of the Penal Code committed on or after September 15, 1961.(d) An offense defined in former subdivision (1) of former Section 311 of the Penal Code repealed by Chapter 2147 of the Statutes of 1961 committed on or after September 7, 1955, and before September 15, 1961.(e) An offense involving lewd and lascivious conduct under Section 272 of the Penal Code committed on or after September 15, 1961.(f) An offense involving lewd and lascivious conduct under former Section 702 of the Welfare and Institutions Code repealed by Chapter 1616 of the Statutes of 1961, if that offense was committed before September 15, 1961, to the same extent that an offense committed before that date was a sex offense for the purposes of this section before September 15, 1961.(g) An offense defined in Section 286 or 288a of the Penal Code before the effective date of the amendment of either section enacted at the 1975–76 Regular Session of the Legislature committed before the effective date of the amendment.(h) An attempt to commit any of the offenses specified in this section.(i) An offense committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws of the United States that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses specified in this section.(j) A conviction for an offense resulting in the requirement to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code.(k) Commitment as a mentally disordered sex offender under former Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as repealed by Chapter 928 of the Statutes of 1981.SEC. 6. Section 44051 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 44050, to read:44051. (a) (1) A person applying for a noncertificated position at a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or applying for any position at a private school, shall provide that prospective employer with a complete list of every school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school and diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that the applicant has previously been an employee of.(2) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, and state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department considering an applicant for a noncertificated position, and private schools considering an applicant for any position, shall inquire with each school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school and diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that previously employed the applicant, as disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1), as to whether the applicant, while previously employed by the school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school was the subject of any credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, that were used to support a substantiated investigation.(3) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools that have made a report of an employee’s egregious misconduct to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall disclose this fact to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school considering an application for employment from the employee, upon inquiry, and, notwithstanding any other law, shall provide the inquiring school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school with a copy of all relevant information that was used to support a substantiated investigation, within its possession.(b) For purposes of this section, noncertificated employees include noncertificated temporary employees regardless of the length of their employment.SEC. 7. Section 44052 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 44051, to read:44052. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the commission shall, contingent upon an appropriation for these purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute, develop a statewide data system that includes all of the following information for individuals serving in a noncertificated position for a local educational agency or in any position for a private school employer:(1) The name, date of birth, and a unique identification number of the employee.(2) The name of the school employer.(3) The starting date, ending date, if applicable, and title for each school position held by the employee.(4) The name of any local educational agency or private school employer that conducted an employee investigation for egregious misconduct that resulted in evidence for a substantiated report, as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, on or after July 1, 2027.(5) The date an investigation described in paragraph (4) was commenced.(6) The date a substantiated report described in paragraph (4) was filed.(b) Those local educational agencies and private school organizations that are responsible for employment, employee investigations, or hiring decisions shall, before hiring an individual for a noncertificated position at a local educational agency or any position at a private school employer, review the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) to determine whether an investigation resulted in a substantiated report pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).(c) Within 30 calendar days of hiring an individual for a noncertificated position at a local educational agency or for any position at a private school employer, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the name and start date of the individual and the title of the position.(d) Within 30 calendar days of an individual changing into, or adding, a noncertificated position with the same local educational agency employer or any position at a private school organization, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the name and start date of the individual and the title of the new or additional position.(e) Within 10 calendar days of a noncertificated employee leaving a position at a local educational agency or any employee leaving a position at a private school, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall provide to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) the final date of employment or final date in the position.(f) (1) Within 10 calendar days of the start of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice to the statewide data system established pursuant to subdivision (a) that an investigation was commenced.(2) Statewide data system records shall indicate a pending status from the receipt of notice pursuant to paragraph (1) until the local educational agency employer or private school employer submits subsequent notice pursuant to this subdivision.(3) Within 10 calendar days of the completion of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice stating the result of the investigation to the statewide data system.(A) If an investigation of egregious misconduct results in a substantiated report as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, a record of the investigation result shall be created in the statewide data system.(B) If an investigation of egregious misconduct results in an unfounded report or inconclusive report as defined in Section 11165.12 of the Penal Code, no record of an investigation shall be created in the statewide data system.(4) If a noncertificated employee leaves a local educational agency employer or any employee leaves a private school employer before the completion of an investigation of egregious misconduct, the local educational agency employer or private school employer shall submit notice of the change in employment status mid-investigation to the statewide data system to be included in the employee’s record.(5) If a previously substantiated report is later determined by the governing board or body of the local educational agency, the private school, or an administrative law judge, if applicable, to be unfounded or inconclusive, the local educational agency or private school shall notify the commission within 10 days. Upon receiving the notification, the commission shall remove the report from the statewide data system.(g) The commission shall serve only as the data administrator for records submitted to the statewide data system pursuant to this section. The commission shall ensure the secure operation and technical functionality of the statewide data system, but shall not be responsible for verifying the truthfulness or legal sufficiency of the information submitted by local educational agency employers or private school employers.(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Egregious misconduct” has the same meaning as defined in Section 44932.(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department.SEC. 8. Section 44242.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:44242.5. (a) Each allegation of an act or omission by an applicant for, or holder of, a credential for which the applicant may be subject to an adverse action shall be presented to the Committee of Credentials.(b) The committee has jurisdiction to commence an initial review upon receipt of any of the following:(1) (A) Official records of the Department of Justice, of a law enforcement agency, of a state or federal court, and of any other agency of this state or another state.(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “agency of this state” has the same meaning as that of “state agency” as set forth in Section 11000 of the Government Code.(2) An affidavit or declaration signed by a person with personal knowledge of the acts alleged to constitute misconduct.(3) (A) A statement from an employer notifying the commission that, as a result of an allegation of misconduct, or while an allegation of misconduct is pending, a credentialholder has been dismissed, nonreelected, suspended for more than 10 days, or placed pursuant to a final adverse employment action on unpaid administrative leave for more than 10 days, or has resigned or otherwise left employment.(B) The employer shall provide the notice described in subparagraph (A) to the commission not later than 30 days after the dismissal, nonreelection, suspension, placement on unpaid administrative leave, resignation, or departure from employment of the employee.(C) For purposes of subparagraphs (A) and (B), a change in status due solely to unsatisfactory performance pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932 or a reduction in force pursuant to Sections 44955 to 44958, inclusive, is not a result of an allegation of misconduct.(4) A notice from an employer that a complaint was filed with the school district alleging sexual misconduct by a credentialholder. Results of an investigation by the committee based on this paragraph shall not be considered for action by the committee unless there is evidence presented to the committee in the form of a written or oral declaration under penalty of perjury that confirms the personal knowledge of the declarant regarding the acts alleged to constitute misconduct.(5) A notice from a school district, employer, public agency, or testing administrator of a violation of Section 44420, 44421.1, 44421.5, or 44439.(6) (A) An affirmative response on an application submitted to the commission as to any conviction, adverse action on, or denial of, a license, or pending investigation into a criminal allegation or pending investigation of a noncriminal allegation of misconduct by a governmental licensing entity.(B) Failure to disclose any matter set forth in subparagraph (A).(7) (A) A record of a substantiated report entered into the statewide data system established pursuant to Section 44052.(B) A record of a start of an investigation followed by a change in employment status during the investigation entered into the statewide data system established pursuant to Section 44052.(c) An initial review commences on the date that the written notice is mailed to the applicant or credentialholder that their fitness to hold a credential is under review. Upon commencement of a formal review pursuant to Section 44244, the committee shall investigate all alleged misconduct and the circumstances in mitigation and aggravation. The investigation shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Investigation of the fitness and competence of the applicant or credentialholder to perform the duties authorized by the credential for which they have applied or that they presently hold.(2) Preparation of a summary of the applicable law, a summary of the facts, contested and uncontested, and a summary of any circumstances in aggravation or mitigation of the allegation.(3) Determination of probable cause for an adverse action on the credential. If the allegation is for unprofessional or immoral conduct, the committee, in any formal review conducted pursuant to Section 44244 to determine probable cause, shall permit the employer of the credentialholder to be present while testimony is taken. If the allegation of unprofessional or immoral conduct involves sexual abuse, the employer shall be examined in the meeting for any relevant evidence relating to the sexual abuse.(A) If the committee determines that probable cause for an adverse action does not exist, the committee shall terminate the investigation.(B) If the committee determines that probable cause for an adverse action on the credential exists, upon receipt of a request from an applicant or a credentialholder pursuant to Section 44244.1, the commission shall initiate an adjudicatory hearing, as prescribed by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, by filing an accusation or statement of issues.(d) The committee has jurisdiction to commence a formal review pursuant to Section 44244 upon receipt of any of the following:(1) (A) Official records of a state or federal court that reflect a conviction or plea, including a plea of nolo contendere, to a criminal offense or official records of a state court that adjudge a juvenile to be a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code due to allegations of sexual misconduct or physical abuse by a credentialholder or applicant.(B) Subparagraph (A) does not relieve the commission from the confidentiality provisions, notice, and due process requirements set forth in Section 827 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) An affidavit or declaration signed by a person with personal knowledge of the acts alleged to constitute misconduct.(3) A statement described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).(4) Official records of a governmental licensing entity that reflect an administrative proceeding or investigation, otherwise authorized by law or regulation, that has become final.(5) A notice described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b).(6) A response or failure to disclose, as described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b).(e) (1) Upon completion of its investigation, the committee shall report its actions and recommendations to the commission, including its findings as to probable cause, and if probable cause exists, its recommendations as to the appropriate adverse action.(2) The findings shall be available, upon its request, to the employing or last known employing school district, or, if adverse action is recommended by the committee and the credentialholder has not filed a timely appeal of the recommendation of the committee pursuant to Section 44244.1, upon a request made within five years of the date of the committee’s recommendations to a school district providing verification that the credentialholder has applied for employment in the school district. The findings, for all purposes, shall remain confidential and limited to school district personnel in a direct supervisory capacity in relation to the person investigated. A person who otherwise releases findings received from the committee or the commission, absent a verified release signed by the person who is the subject of the investigation, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.(3) The findings shall not contain any information that reveals the identity of persons other than the person who is the subject of the investigation.(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and, notwithstanding subdivision (b), for purposes of determining whether jurisdiction exists under subdivision (b), the commission, in accordance with Section 44341, may make inquiries and requests for production of information and records only from the Department of Justice, a law enforcement agency, a state or federal court, and a licensing agency of this state, or a licensing agency of another state.(2) For purposes of determining whether jurisdiction exists, paragraph (1) does not apply to release of personnel records.(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), convictions for controlled substance offenses listed in Section 11350 or 11377, or former Section 11500 or 11500.5, of the Health and Safety Code that are more than five years old, for which relief is granted pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, or 1203.49 of the Penal Code, shall not be presented to the Committee on Credentials.SEC. 9. Section 44691 of the Education Code, as added by Section 2 of Chapter 814 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:44691. (a) The State Department of Education, in consultation with the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services, shall do all of the following:(1) Develop and disseminate information to all school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, and charter schools, and their school personnel in California, regarding the detection and reporting of child abuse, and post on the department’s internet website links to existing training resources.(2) Provide statewide guidance on the responsibilities of mandated reporters who are school personnel in accordance with the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code). This guidance shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, both of the following:(A) Information on the identification of child abuse and neglect.(B) Reporting requirements for child abuse and neglect.(b) (1) The State Department of Education shall develop and disseminate information to all school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, and charter schools, and their school personnel in California, regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse, of children on school grounds, by school personnel, or in school-sponsored programs.(2) The State Department of Education shall develop appropriate means of instructing school personnel regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse, of children on school grounds, by school personnel, or in school-sponsored programs.(c) School districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, and charter schools shall do the following:(1) (A) Provide annual training, using the online training module provided by the State Department of Social Services or as provided in subdivision (d), to their employees and persons working on their behalf who are mandated reporters, as defined in Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, pursuant to this section and subdivision (d) of Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code on the mandated reporting requirements. This training shall include information that failure to report an incident of known or reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect, as required by Section 11166 of the Penal Code, is a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months confinement in a county jail, or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(B) Provide annual training on the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse, of children on school grounds, by school personnel, or in school-sponsored programs.(C) The training provided pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be provided to school personnel hired during the course of the school year.(D) It is the intent of the Legislature that the child abuse prevention content, as added by Assembly Bill 1913 of the 2023–24 Regular Session, will not add to the duration of training requirements pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2024, but instead only alter the content of those training requirements.(2) Develop a process for all persons required to receive training pursuant to this section to provide proof of completing the training within the first six weeks of each school year or within the first six weeks of that person’s employment. The process developed under this paragraph may include, but not necessarily be limited to, the use of a sign-in sheet or the submission of a certificate of completion to the applicable governing board or body of the school district, county office of education, state special school and diagnostic center, or charter school.(d) School districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, and charter schools that do not use the online training module provided by the State Department of Social Services shall report to the State Department of Education the training being used in its place.(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.SEC. 10. Section 44691 is added to the Education Code, to read:44691. (a) The State Department of Education, in consultation with the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services, shall do all of the following:(1) Develop and disseminate information to all school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, private schools, and charter schools, and their school personnel and volunteers in California, regarding the detection and reporting of child abuse and assault, and post on the department’s internet website links to existing training resources.(2) Provide statewide guidance on the responsibilities of mandated reporters who are school personnel in accordance with the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code). This guidance shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:(A) Information on the identification of child abuse and neglect and child sexual abuse and assault.(B) Reporting requirements for child abuse and neglect and child sexual abuse and assault.(b) (1) The State Department of Education shall develop and disseminate information to all school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, private schools, and charter schools, and their school personnel and volunteers in California, regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, of children on school grounds, by school personnel and volunteers, or in school-sponsored programs.(2) The State Department of Education shall develop appropriate means of instructing school personnel regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse, of children on school grounds, by school personnel, or in school-sponsored programs.(c) School districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, private schools, and charter schools shall do the following:(1) (A) Provide annual training, using the online training module provided by the State Department of Social Services or as provided in subdivision (d), to their employees, volunteers, and persons working on their behalf who are mandated reporters, as defined in Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, pursuant to this section and subdivision (d) of Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code on the mandated reporting requirements. This training shall include information that failure to report an incident of known or reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect, as required by Section 11166 of the Penal Code, is a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months confinement in a county jail, or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(B) Provide annual training on the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, of children on school grounds, by school personnel and volunteers, or in school-sponsored programs.(C) The training provided pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be provided to school personnel hired during the course of the school year and to volunteers upon commencing volunteer services.(D) It is the intent of the Legislature that the child abuse prevention content, as added by Assembly Bill 1913 of the 2023–24 Regular Session, will not add to the duration of training requirements pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2024, but instead only alter the content of those training requirements.(2) Develop a process for all persons required to receive training pursuant to this section to provide proof of completing the training within the first six weeks of each school year, within the first six weeks of that person’s employment, or within six weeks of commencing volunteer services. The process developed under this paragraph may include, but not be limited to, the use of a sign-in sheet or the submission of a certificate of completion to the applicable governing board or body of the school district, county office of education, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, private school, or charter school.(d) (1) School districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, private schools, and charter schools that do not use the online training module provided by the State Department of Social Services shall use an equivalent training module developed specifically to meet the requirements of this section and report that training to the State Department of Education.(2) The alternative training module shall be approved by the public entity risk pool joint powers authority or liability insurance provider used by the school district, county office of education, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, private school, or charter school.(e) For purposes of this section, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(f) A person who has completed the mandated reporter training provided by the State Department of Social Services and received a certificate of completion within the previous 12 months shall be deemed to satisfy the training requirements specified in this section.(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the child sexual abuse and assault content, as added by Senate Bill 848 of the 2025–26 Regular Session, will not add to the duration of training requirements pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2025, but instead only alter the content of those training requirements.(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.SEC. 11. Section 44830.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:44830.1. (a) In addition to any other prohibition or provision, no person who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or of a sex offense, shall be hired by a school district in a position requiring certification qualifications or supervising positions requiring certification qualifications. A school district shall not retain in employment a current certificated employee who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or of a sex offense, and who is a temporary employee, a substitute employee, or a probationary employee serving before March 15 of the employee’s second probationary year. If any conviction is reversed and the formerly convicted person is acquitted of the offense in a new trial, or the charges are dismissed, this section does not prohibit their employment thereafter.(b) This section applies to any violent, serious, or sex offense which, if committed in this state, would have been punishable as a violent or serious felony or as a sex offense.(c) (1) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:(A) A violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.(B) A serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.(C) A sex offense is an offense listed in Section 44010 other than those described in subparagraph (A) or (B).(2) For purposes of this section, a plea of nolo contendere to a serious or violent felony or a sex offense constitutes a conviction.(3) For purposes of this section, the term “school district” has the same meaning as defined in Section 41302.5.(d) When the governing board of any school district requests a criminal record summary of a temporary, substitute, or probationary certificated employee, two fingerprint cards, bearing the legible rolled and flat impressions of the person’s fingerprints together with a personal description and the fee, shall be submitted, by any means authorized by the Department of Justice, to the Department of Justice.(e) When the Department of Justice ascertains that an individual who is an applicant for employment by a school district has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or for purposes of implementing the prohibitions set forth in Section 44836, any sex offense, as defined in Section 44010, or any controlled substance offense, as defined in Section 44011, the department shall notify the school district of the criminal information pertaining to the applicant. The notification shall be delivered by telephone or electronic mail to the school district. The notification to the school district shall cease to be made once the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is returning responses within three working days. The Department of Justice shall send by first-class mail or electronic mail a copy of the criminal information to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs associated with processing, reviewing, and supplying the criminal record summary required by this section. In no event shall the fee exceed the actual costs incurred by the department.(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or of a sex offense, if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony or sex offense if that person can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that they have been rehabilitated for the purposes of school employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court in the school district in which they are a resident.(h) Notwithstanding any other law, when the Department of Justice notifies a school district by telephone or electronic mail that a current temporary employee, substitute employee, or probationary employee serving before March 15 of the employee’s second probationary year, has been convicted of a violent or serious felony, or of a sex offense, that employee shall immediately be placed on leave without pay. When the school district receives written electronic notification of the fact of conviction from the Department of Justice, the employee shall be terminated automatically and without regard to any other procedure for termination specified in this code or school district procedures unless the employee challenges the record of the Department of Justice and the Department of Justice withdraws in writing its notification to the school district. Upon receipt of written withdrawal of notification from the Department of Justice, the employee shall immediately be reinstated with full restoration of salary and benefits for the period of time from the suspension without pay to the reinstatement.(i) An employer shall request subsequent arrest service from the Department of Justice as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.(j) Notwithstanding Section 47610, this section applies to a charter school.(k) This section shall not apply to a certificated employee who applies to renew their credential when both of the following conditions have been met:(1) The employee’s original application for credential was accompanied by that person’s fingerprints.(2) The employee has either been continuously employed in one or more public school districts since the issuance or last renewal of their credential or their credential has not expired between renewals.(l) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county superintendent of schools from issuing a temporary certificate to any person described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (k).(m) This section shall not prohibit a school district from hiring a certificated employee who became a permanent employee of another school district as of October 1, 1997.(n) All information obtained from the Department of Justice is confidential. Every agency handling Department of Justice information shall ensure the following:(1) No recipient may disclose its contents or provide copies of information.(2) Information received shall be stored in a locked file separate from other files, and shall only be accessible to the custodian of records.(3) Information received shall be destroyed upon the hiring determination in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 708 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations.(4) Compliance with destruction, storage, dissemination, auditing, backgrounding, and training requirements as set forth in Sections 700 to 708, inclusive, of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 11077 of the Penal Code governing the use and security of criminal offender record information is the responsibility of the entity receiving the information from the Department of Justice.SEC. 12. Section 44939.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:44939.5. (a) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools shall not enter into an agreement that would prevent a mandatory report of egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or any other state or federal agency.(b) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools shall not expunge from an employee’s personnel file, nor shall they enter into an agreement that would authorize expunging from an employee’s personnel file, credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932. This prohibition does not preclude removing, or entering into an agreement to remove, documents containing allegations that have been the subject of a hearing before an arbitrator, school board, personnel commission, Commission on Professional Competence, or administrative law judge, in which the employee prevailed, the allegations were determined to be false, not credible, or unsubstantiated, or a determination was made that the discipline was not warranted.(c) (1) A person applying for a certificated position at a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school shall provide that prospective employer with a complete list of every school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that the applicant has previously been an employee of.(2) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools considering an applicant for a certificated position shall inquire with each school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school and diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that previously employed the applicant, as disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1), as to whether the applicant, while previously employed by the school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school was the subject of any credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, that were required to be reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.(3) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools that have made a report of an employee’s egregious misconduct to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall disclose this fact to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school considering an application for employment from the employee, upon inquiry, and, notwithstanding any other law, shall provide the inquiring school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school with a copy of all relevant information that was reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, within its possession.(d) Any school employee who alleges that another school employee has engaged in egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, knowing at the time of making the allegation that the allegation was false, shall be subject to certificate revocation, if applicable.SEC. 13. Section 51950 of the Education Code is amended to read:51950. (a) Except as required by subdivision (d), a school district may provide abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking prevention education.(b) For purposes of this section, “abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking prevention education” means instruction on the prevalence and nature of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking, strategies to reduce risk, techniques to set healthy boundaries, and how to safely seek assistance.(c) The Superintendent, in consultation with the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services, local educational agencies, and public entity risk pool joint powers authorities that provide risk management services to California schools, shall do all of the following:(1) On or before July 1, 2026, develop, disseminate to all school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools, and post on the department’s internet website, resources and information regarding all of the following:(A) Building awareness and understanding of appropriate boundaries regarding adult-to-pupil interactions and relationships.(B) Building awareness and understanding of appropriate professional boundaries between pupils and school personnel and volunteers.(C) Building awareness and understanding of appropriate pupil-to-pupil interactions and relationships.(D) Building awareness and understanding of the detection and indicators of inappropriate behaviors in adults and pupils, and strategies to reduce risk and establish healthy boundaries.(E) Options to report child abuse and assault, and inappropriate interactions and relationships, and to safely seek assistance.(2) On or before July 1, 2026, develop guidance on the appropriate means of instructing pupils regarding the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, of pupils, consistent with all of the following:(A) The instruction shall be age appropriate and differentiated by grade and instructional setting.(B) The instruction shall include the prevention of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, of children at home, in the community, on school grounds, by school personnel, other pupils, and school volunteers, or in school-sponsored programs.(C) The instruction shall be delivered by certificated personnel who do not otherwise have regular contact with the pupils receiving the instruction and who have received training described in subdivision (h).(d) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools may provide annual instruction, using the resources, information, and guidance developed and disseminated by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (c), to all enrolled pupils.(e) A parent or guardian of a pupil shall have the right to excuse their child from all or part of abuse, including sexual abuse, and human trafficking prevention education, and assessments related to that education, and from the instruction described in subdivision (d), consistent with Section 51938.(f) The Superintendent may make available on the department’s internet website information about the education described in this section, resources on abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking prevention for professional learning purposes, and relevant materials for parents, guardians, and other caretakers of pupils.(g) A school district is encouraged to collaborate with its county’s child welfare probation, mental health, public health, and sheriff’s departments, juvenile court, and office of education on intervention programs for pupils and other minors.(h) As part of satisfying the requirements of Section 51934 that education be provided by instructors trained in the appropriate courses, as defined in Section 51931, continuation training shall be available and conducted periodically to enable school district personnel to learn about new developments in the understanding of abuse, including sexual abuse and assault, and human trafficking, and to receive instruction on current prevention efforts and methods. A school district is encouraged to include training on early identification of abuse, including sexual abuse, and human trafficking of pupils and other minors.SEC. 14. Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code is amended to read:11165.7. (a) As used in this article, “mandated reporter” is defined as any of the following:(1) An employee, volunteer, or governing board or body member of a school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(2) An employee, volunteer, or board member of a public or private school, contractor to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, or private school whose duties require contact with or supervision of pupils at that school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, or private school. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(3) An employee or volunteer assigned to a state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(4) [Reserved](5) [Reserved](6) An administrator of a public or private day camp.(7) An administrator or employee of a public or private youth center, youth recreation program, or youth organization.(8) An administrator, board member, or employee of a public or private organization whose duties require direct contact and supervision of children, including a foster family agency.(9) [Reserved](10) A licensee, an administrator, or an employee of a licensed child daycare facility or community care facility, except those licensed community care facilities exclusively serving adults and seniors.(11) A Head Start program teacher.(12) A licensing worker or licensing evaluator employed by a licensing agency, as defined in Section 11165.11.(13) A public assistance worker.(14) An employee of a childcare institution, including, but not limited to, foster parents, group home personnel, and personnel of residential care facilities.(15) A social worker, probation officer, or parole officer.(16) [Reserved](17) A person who is an administrator or presenter of, or a counselor in, a child abuse prevention program in a public or private school.(18) A district attorney investigator, inspector, or local child support agency caseworker, unless the investigator, inspector, or caseworker is working with an attorney appointed pursuant to Section 317 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to represent a minor.(19) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, who is not otherwise described in this section.(20) A firefighter, except for volunteer firefighters.(21) A physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, dentist, resident, intern, podiatrist, chiropractor, licensed nurse, dental hygienist, optometrist, marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or any other person who is currently licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.(22) An emergency medical technician I or II, paramedic, or other person certified pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.(23) A psychological assistant registered pursuant to Section 2913 of the Business and Professions Code.(24) A marriage and family therapist trainee, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4980.03 of the Business and Professions Code.(25) An unlicensed associate marriage and family therapist registered under Section 4980.44 of the Business and Professions Code.(26) A state or county public health employee who treats a minor for venereal disease or any other condition.(27) A coroner.(28) A medical examiner or other person who performs autopsies.(29) A commercial film and photographic print or image processor as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “commercial film and photographic print or image processor” means a person who develops exposed photographic film into negatives, slides, or prints, or who makes prints from negatives or slides, or who prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or an image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disk, data storage medium, CD-ROM, computer-generated equipment, or computer-generated image, for compensation. The term includes any employee of that person; it does not include a person who develops film or makes prints or images for a public agency.(30) A child visitation monitor. As used in this article, “child visitation monitor” means a person who, for financial compensation, acts as a monitor of a visit between a child and another person when the monitoring of that visit has been ordered by a court of law.(31) An animal control officer or humane society officer. For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(A) “Animal control officer” means a person employed by a city, county, or city and county for the purpose of enforcing animal control laws or regulations.(B) “Humane society officer” means a person appointed or employed by a public or private entity as a humane officer who is qualified pursuant to Section 14502 or 14503 of the Corporations Code.(32) A clergy member, as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “clergy member” means a priest, minister, rabbi, religious practitioner, or similar functionary of a church, temple, or recognized denomination or organization.(33) Any custodian of records of a clergy member, as specified in this section and subdivision (d) of Section 11166.(34) An employee of any police department, county sheriff’s department, county probation department, or county welfare department.(35) An employee or volunteer of a Court Appointed Special Advocate program, as defined in Rule 5.655 of the California Rules of Court.(36) A custodial officer, as defined in Section 831.5.(37) A person providing services to a minor child under Section 12300 or 12300.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(38) An alcohol and drug counselor. As used in this article, an “alcohol and drug counselor” is a person providing counseling, therapy, or other clinical services for a state licensed or certified drug, alcohol, or drug and alcohol treatment program. However, alcohol or drug abuse, or both alcohol and drug abuse, is not, in and of itself, a sufficient basis for reporting child abuse or neglect.(39) A clinical counselor trainee, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 4999.12 of the Business and Professions Code.(40) An associate professional clinical counselor registered under Section 4999.42 of the Business and Professions Code.(41) An employee or administrator of a public or private postsecondary educational institution, whose duties bring the administrator or employee into contact with children on a regular basis, or who supervises those whose duties bring the administrator or employee into contact with children on a regular basis, as to child abuse or neglect occurring on that institution’s premises or at an official activity of, or program conducted by, the institution. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as altering the lawyer-client privilege as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.(42) An athletic coach, athletic administrator, or athletic director employed by any public or private school that provides any combination of instruction for kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(43) (A) A commercial computer technician as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “commercial computer technician” means a person who works for a company that is in the business of repairing, installing, or otherwise servicing a computer or computer component, including, but not limited to, a computer part, device, memory storage or recording mechanism, auxiliary storage recording or memory capacity, or any other material relating to the operation and maintenance of a computer or computer network system, for a fee. An employer who provides an electronic communications service or a remote computing service to the public shall be deemed to comply with this article if that employer complies with Section 2258A of Title 18 of the United States Code.(B) An employer of a commercial computer technician may implement internal procedures for facilitating reporting consistent with this article. These procedures may direct employees who are mandated reporters under this paragraph to report materials described in subdivision (e) of Section 11166 to an employee who is designated by the employer to receive the reports. An employee who is designated to receive reports under this subparagraph shall be a commercial computer technician for purposes of this article. A commercial computer technician who makes a report to the designated employee pursuant to this subparagraph shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this article and shall be subject to the protections afforded to mandated reporters, including, but not limited to, those protections afforded by Section 11172.(44) Any athletic coach, including, but not limited to, an assistant coach or a graduate assistant involved in coaching, at public or private postsecondary educational institutions.(45) An individual certified by a licensed foster family agency as a certified family home, as defined in Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code.(46) An individual approved as a resource family, as defined in Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(47) A qualified autism service provider, a qualified autism service professional, or a qualified autism service paraprofessional, as defined in Section 1374.73 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10144.51 of the Insurance Code.(48) A human resource employee of a business subject to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that employs minors. For purposes of this section, a “human resource employee” is the employee or employees designated by the employer to accept any complaints of misconduct as required by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 12940) of Part 2.8 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(49) An adult person whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of minors in the performance of the minors’ duties in the workplace of a business subject to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code is a mandated reporter of sexual abuse, as defined in Section 11165.1. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to modify or limit the person’s duty to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect when the person is acting in some other capacity that would otherwise make the person a mandated reporter.(b) Except as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (35) of subdivision (a), volunteers of public or private organizations whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children are not mandated reporters but are encouraged to obtain training in the identification and reporting of child abuse and neglect and are further encouraged to report known or suspected instances of child abuse or neglect to an agency specified in Section 11165.9.(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) and paragraph (2), employers are strongly encouraged to provide their employees who are mandated reporters with training in the duties imposed by this article. This training shall include training in child abuse and neglect identification and training in child abuse and neglect reporting. Whether or not employers provide their employees with training in child abuse and neglect identification and reporting, the employers shall provide their employees who are mandated reporters with the statement required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11166.5.(2) Employers subject to paragraphs (48) and (49) of subdivision (a) shall provide their employees who are mandated reporters with training in the duties imposed by this article. This training shall include training in child abuse and neglect identification and training in child abuse and neglect reporting. The training requirement may be met by completing the general online training for mandated reporters offered by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services.(d) Pursuant to Section 44691 of the Education Code, school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, charter schools, and, commencing July 1, 2026, private schools, shall annually train their employees and persons working on their behalf specified in subdivision (a) in the duties of mandated reporters under the child abuse reporting laws. The training shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, training in child abuse and neglect identification and child abuse and neglect reporting.(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 1596.8662 of the Health and Safety Code, a childcare licensee applicant shall take training in the duties of mandated reporters under the child abuse reporting laws as a condition of licensure, and a childcare administrator or an employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall take training in the duties of mandated reporters during the first 90 days when that administrator or employee is employed by the facility.(2) A person specified in paragraph (1) who becomes a licensee, administrator, or employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall take renewal mandated reporter training every two years following the date on which that person completed the initial mandated reporter training. The training shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, training in child abuse and neglect identification and child abuse and neglect reporting.(f) Unless otherwise specifically provided, the absence of training shall not excuse a mandated reporter from the duties imposed by this article.(g) Public and private organizations are encouraged to provide their volunteers whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children with training in the identification and reporting of child abuse and neglect.SEC. 14.1. Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code is amended to read:11165.7. (a) As used in this article, “mandated reporter” is defined as any of the following:(1) An employee, volunteer, or governing board or body member of a school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(2) An employee, volunteer, or board member of a public or private school, contractor to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, or private school whose duties require contact with or supervision of pupils at that school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, or private school. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(3) An employee or volunteer assigned to a state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(4) [Reserved](5) [Reserved](6) An administrator of a public or private day camp.(7) An administrator or employee of a public or private youth center, youth recreation program, or youth organization.(8) An administrator, board member, or employee of a public or private organization whose duties require direct contact and supervision of children, including a foster family agency.(9) [Reserved](10) A licensee, an administrator, or an employee of a licensed child daycare facility or community care facility, except those licensed community care facilities exclusively serving adults and seniors.(11) A Head Start program teacher.(12) A licensing worker or licensing evaluator employed by a licensing agency, as defined in Section 11165.11.(13) A public assistance worker.(14) An employee of a childcare institution, including, but not limited to, foster parents, group home personnel, and personnel of residential care facilities.(15) A social worker, probation officer, or parole officer.(16) [Reserved](17) A person who is an administrator or presenter of, or a counselor in, a child abuse prevention program in a public or private school.(18) A district attorney investigator, inspector, or local child support agency caseworker, unless the investigator, inspector, or caseworker is working with an attorney appointed pursuant to Section 317 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to represent a minor.(19) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, who is not otherwise described in this section.(20) A firefighter, except for volunteer firefighters.(21) A physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, dentist, resident, intern, podiatrist, chiropractor, licensed nurse, dental hygienist, optometrist, marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or any other person who is currently licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.(22) An emergency medical technician I or II, paramedic, or other person certified pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.(23) A psychological assistant registered pursuant to Section 2913 of the Business and Professions Code.(24) A marriage and family therapist trainee, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4980.03 of the Business and Professions Code.(25) An unlicensed associate marriage and family therapist registered under Section 4980.44 of the Business and Professions Code.(26) A state or county public health employee who treats a minor for venereal disease or any other condition.(27) A coroner.(28) A medical examiner or other person who performs autopsies.(29) A commercial film and photographic print or image processor as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “commercial film and photographic print or image processor” means a person who develops exposed photographic film into negatives, slides, or prints, or who makes prints from negatives or slides, or who prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or an image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disk, data storage medium, CD-ROM, computer-generated equipment, or computer-generated image, for compensation. The term includes any employee of that person; it does not include a person who develops film or makes prints or images for a public agency.(30) A child visitation monitor. As used in this article, “child visitation monitor” means a person who, for financial compensation, acts as a monitor of a visit between a child and another person when the monitoring of that visit has been ordered by a court of law.(31) An animal control officer or humane society officer. For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(A) “Animal control officer” means a person employed by a city, county, or city and county for the purpose of enforcing animal control laws or regulations.(B) “Humane society officer” means a person appointed or employed by a public or private entity as a humane officer who is qualified pursuant to Section 14502 or 14503 of the Corporations Code.(32) A clergy member, as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “clergy member” means a priest, minister, rabbi, religious practitioner, or similar functionary of a church, temple, or recognized denomination or organization.(33) Any custodian of records of a clergy member, as specified in this section and subdivision (d) of Section 11166.(34) An employee of any police department, county sheriff’s department, county probation department, or county welfare department.(35) An employee or volunteer of a Court Appointed Special Advocate program, as defined in Rule 5.655 of the California Rules of Court.(36) A custodial officer, as defined in Section 831.5.(37) A person providing services to a minor child under Section 12300 or 12300.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(38) An alcohol and drug counselor. As used in this article, an “alcohol and drug counselor” is a person providing counseling, therapy, or other clinical services for a state licensed or certified drug, alcohol, or drug and alcohol treatment program. However, alcohol or drug abuse, or both alcohol and drug abuse, is not, in and of itself, a sufficient basis for reporting child abuse or neglect.(39) A clinical counselor trainee, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 4999.12 of the Business and Professions Code.(40) An associate professional clinical counselor registered under Section 4999.42 of the Business and Professions Code.(41) An employee or administrator of a public or private postsecondary educational institution, whose duties bring the administrator or employee into contact with children on a regular basis, or who supervises those whose duties bring the administrator or employee into contact with children on a regular basis, as to child abuse or neglect occurring on that institution’s premises or at an official activity of, or program conducted by, the institution. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as altering the lawyer-client privilege as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.(42) An athletic coach, athletic administrator, or athletic director employed by any public or private school that provides any combination of instruction for kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(43) (A) A commercial computer technician as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “commercial computer technician” means a person who works for a company that is in the business of repairing, installing, or otherwise servicing a computer or computer component, including, but not limited to, a computer part, device, memory storage or recording mechanism, auxiliary storage recording or memory capacity, or any other material relating to the operation and maintenance of a computer or computer network system, for a fee. An employer who provides an electronic communications service or a remote computing service to the public shall be deemed to comply with this article if that employer complies with Section 2258A of Title 18 of the United States Code.(B) An employer of a commercial computer technician may implement internal procedures for facilitating reporting consistent with this article. These procedures may direct employees who are mandated reporters under this paragraph to report materials described in subdivision (e) of Section 11166 to an employee who is designated by the employer to receive the reports. An employee who is designated to receive reports under this subparagraph shall be a commercial computer technician for purposes of this article. A commercial computer technician who makes a report to the designated employee pursuant to this subparagraph shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this article and shall be subject to the protections afforded to mandated reporters, including, but not limited to, those protections afforded by Section 11172.(44) Any athletic coach, including, but not limited to, an assistant coach or a graduate assistant involved in coaching, at public or private postsecondary educational institutions.(45) An individual certified by a licensed foster family agency as a certified family home, as defined in Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code.(46) An individual approved as a resource family, as defined in Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(47) A qualified autism service provider, a qualified autism service professional, or a qualified autism service paraprofessional as defined in Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 4999.200) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(48) A human resource employee of a business subject to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that employs minors. For purposes of this section, a “human resource employee” is the employee or employees designated by the employer to accept any complaints of misconduct as required by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 12940) of Part 2.8 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(49) An adult person whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of minors in the performance of the minors’ duties in the workplace of a business subject to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code is a mandated reporter of sexual abuse, as defined in Section 11165.1. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to modify or limit the person’s duty to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect when the person is acting in some other capacity that would otherwise make the person a mandated reporter.(b) Except as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (35) of subdivision (a), volunteers of public or private organizations whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children are not mandated reporters but are encouraged to obtain training in the identification and reporting of child abuse and neglect and are further encouraged to report known or suspected instances of child abuse or neglect to an agency specified in Section 11165.9.(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) and paragraph (2), employers are strongly encouraged to provide their employees who are mandated reporters with training in the duties imposed by this article. This training shall include training in child abuse and neglect identification and training in child abuse and neglect reporting. Whether or not employers provide their employees with training in child abuse and neglect identification and reporting, the employers shall provide their employees who are mandated reporters with the statement required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11166.5.(2) Employers subject to paragraphs (48) and (49) of subdivision (a) shall provide their employees who are mandated reporters with training in the duties imposed by this article. This training shall include training in child abuse and neglect identification and training in child abuse and neglect reporting. The training requirement may be met by completing the general online training for mandated reporters offered by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services.(d) Pursuant to Section 44691 of the Education Code, school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, charter schools, and, commencing July 1, 2026, private schools, shall annually train their employees and persons working on their behalf specified in subdivision (a) in the duties of mandated reporters under the child abuse reporting laws. The training shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, training in child abuse and neglect identification and child abuse and neglect reporting.(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 1596.8662 of the Health and Safety Code, a childcare licensee applicant shall take training in the duties of mandated reporters under the child abuse reporting laws as a condition of licensure, and a childcare administrator or an employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall take training in the duties of mandated reporters during the first 90 days when that administrator or employee is employed by the facility.(2) A person specified in paragraph (1) who becomes a licensee, administrator, or employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall take renewal mandated reporter training every two years following the date on which that person completed the initial mandated reporter training. The training shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, training in child abuse and neglect identification and child abuse and neglect reporting.(f) Unless otherwise specifically provided, the absence of training shall not excuse a mandated reporter from the duties imposed by this article.(g) Public and private organizations are encouraged to provide their volunteers whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children with training in the identification and reporting of child abuse and neglect.SEC. 14.2. Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code is amended to read:11165.7. (a) As used in this article, “mandated reporter” is defined as any of the following:(1) An employee, volunteer, or governing board or body member of a school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(2) An employee, volunteer, or board member of a public or private school, contractor to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, or private school whose duties require contact with or supervision of pupils at that school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, or private school. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(3) An employee or volunteer assigned to a state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(4) [Reserved](5) [Reserved](6) An administrator of a public or private day camp.(7) An administrator or employee of a public or private youth center, youth recreation program, or youth organization.(8) An administrator, board member, or employee of a public or private organization whose duties require direct contact and supervision of children, including a foster family agency.(9) [Reserved](10) A licensee, an administrator, or an employee of a licensed child daycare facility or community care facility, except those licensed community care facilities exclusively serving adults and seniors.(11) A Head Start program teacher.(12) A licensing worker or licensing evaluator employed by a licensing agency, as defined in Section 11165.11.(13) A public assistance worker.(14) An employee of a childcare institution, including, but not limited to, foster parents, group home personnel, and personnel of residential care facilities.(15) A social worker, probation officer, or parole officer.(16) [Reserved](17) A person who is an administrator or presenter of, or a counselor in, a child abuse prevention program in a public or private school.(18) A district attorney investigator, inspector, or local child support agency caseworker, unless the investigator, inspector, or caseworker is working with an attorney appointed pursuant to Section 317 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to represent a minor.(19) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, who is not otherwise described in this section.(20) A firefighter, except for volunteer firefighters.(21) A physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, dentist, resident, intern, podiatrist, chiropractor, licensed nurse, dental hygienist, optometrist, marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or any other person who is currently licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.(22) An emergency medical technician I or II, paramedic, or other person certified pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.(23) A psychological assistant registered pursuant to Section 2913 of the Business and Professions Code.(24) A marriage and family therapist trainee, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4980.03 of the Business and Professions Code.(25) An unlicensed associate marriage and family therapist registered under Section 4980.44 of the Business and Professions Code.(26) A state or county public health employee who treats a minor for venereal disease or any other condition.(27) A coroner.(28) A medical examiner or other person who performs autopsies.(29) A commercial film and photographic print or image processor as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “commercial film and photographic print or image processor” means a person who develops exposed photographic film into negatives, slides, or prints, or who makes prints from negatives or slides, or who prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or an image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disk, data storage medium, CD-ROM, computer-generated equipment, or computer-generated image, for compensation. The term includes any employee of that person; it does not include a person who develops film or makes prints or images for a public agency.(30) A child visitation monitor. As used in this article, “child visitation monitor” means a person who, for financial compensation, acts as a monitor of a visit between a child and another person when the monitoring of that visit has been ordered by a court of law.(31) An animal control officer or humane society officer. For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(A) “Animal control officer” means a person employed by a city, county, or city and county for the purpose of enforcing animal control laws or regulations.(B) “Humane society officer” means a person appointed or employed by a public or private entity as a humane officer who is qualified pursuant to Section 14502 or 14503 of the Corporations Code.(32) A clergy member, as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “clergy member” means a priest, minister, rabbi, religious practitioner, or similar functionary of a church, temple, or recognized denomination or organization.(33) Any custodian of records of a clergy member, as specified in this section and subdivision (d) of Section 11166.(34) An employee of any police department, county sheriff’s department, county probation department, or county welfare department.(35) An employee or volunteer of a Court Appointed Special Advocate program, as defined in Rule 5.655 of the California Rules of Court.(36) A custodial officer, as defined in Section 831.5.(37) A person providing services to a minor child under Section 12300 or 12300.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(38) An alcohol and drug counselor. As used in this article, an “alcohol and drug counselor” is a person providing counseling, therapy, or other clinical services for a state licensed or certified drug, alcohol, or drug and alcohol treatment program. However, alcohol or drug abuse, or both alcohol and drug abuse, is not, in and of itself, a sufficient basis for reporting child abuse or neglect.(39) A clinical counselor trainee, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 4999.12 of the Business and Professions Code.(40) An associate professional clinical counselor registered under Section 4999.42 of the Business and Professions Code.(41) An employee or administrator of a public or private postsecondary educational institution, whose duties bring the administrator or employee into contact with children on a regular basis, or who supervises those whose duties bring the administrator or employee into contact with children on a regular basis, as to child abuse or neglect occurring on that institution’s premises or at an official activity of, or program conducted by, the institution. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as altering the lawyer-client privilege as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.(42) An athletic coach, athletic administrator, or athletic director employed by any public or private school that provides any combination of instruction for kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(43) (A) A commercial computer technician as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “commercial computer technician” means a person who works for a company that is in the business of repairing, installing, or otherwise servicing a computer or computer component, including, but not limited to, a computer part, device, memory storage or recording mechanism, auxiliary storage recording or memory capacity, or any other material relating to the operation and maintenance of a computer or computer network system, for a fee. An employer who provides an electronic communications service or a remote computing service to the public shall be deemed to comply with this article if that employer complies with Section 2258A of Title 18 of the United States Code.(B) An employer of a commercial computer technician may implement internal procedures for facilitating reporting consistent with this article. These procedures may direct employees who are mandated reporters under this paragraph to report materials described in subdivision (e) of Section 11166 to an employee who is designated by the employer to receive the reports. An employee who is designated to receive reports under this subparagraph shall be a commercial computer technician for purposes of this article. A commercial computer technician who makes a report to the designated employee pursuant to this subparagraph shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this article and shall be subject to the protections afforded to mandated reporters, including, but not limited to, those protections afforded by Section 11172.(44) Any athletic coach, including, but not limited to, an assistant coach or a graduate assistant involved in coaching, at public or private postsecondary educational institutions.(45) An individual certified by a licensed foster family agency as a certified family home, as defined in Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code.(46) An individual approved as a resource family, as defined in Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(47) A qualified autism service provider, a qualified autism service professional, or a qualified autism service paraprofessional, as defined in Section 1374.73 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10144.51 of the Insurance Code.(48) A human resource employee of a business subject to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that employs minors. For purposes of this section, a “human resource employee” is the employee or employees designated by the employer to accept any complaints of misconduct as required by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 12940) of Part 2.8 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(49) An adult person whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of minors in the performance of the minors’ duties in the workplace of a business subject to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code is a mandated reporter of sexual abuse, as defined in Section 11165.1. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to modify or limit the person’s duty to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect when the person is acting in some other capacity that would otherwise make the person a mandated reporter.(50) An individual employed as a talent agent, talent manager, or talent coach, who provides services to a minor.(b) Except as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (35) of subdivision (a), volunteers of public or private organizations whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children are not mandated reporters but are encouraged to obtain training in the identification and reporting of child abuse and neglect and are further encouraged to report known or suspected instances of child abuse or neglect to an agency specified in Section 11165.9.(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) and paragraph (2), employers are strongly encouraged to provide their employees who are mandated reporters with training in the duties imposed by this article. This training shall include training in child abuse and neglect identification and training in child abuse and neglect reporting. Whether or not employers provide their employees with training in child abuse and neglect identification and reporting, the employers shall provide their employees who are mandated reporters with the statement required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11166.5.(2) Employers subject to paragraphs (48) and (49) of subdivision (a) shall provide their employees who are mandated reporters with training in the duties imposed by this article. This training shall include training in child abuse and neglect identification and training in child abuse and neglect reporting. The training requirement may be met by completing the general online training for mandated reporters offered by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services.(d) Pursuant to Section 44691 of the Education Code, school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, charter schools, and, commencing July 1, 2026, private schools, shall annually train their employees and persons working on their behalf specified in subdivision (a) in the duties of mandated reporters under the child abuse reporting laws. The training shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, training in child abuse and neglect identification and child abuse and neglect reporting.(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 1596.8662 of the Health and Safety Code, a childcare licensee applicant shall take training in the duties of mandated reporters under the child abuse reporting laws as a condition of licensure, and a childcare administrator or an employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall take training in the duties of mandated reporters during the first 90 days when that administrator or employee is employed by the facility.(2) A person specified in paragraph (1) who becomes a licensee, administrator, or employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall take renewal mandated reporter training every two years following the date on which that person completed the initial mandated reporter training. The training shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, training in child abuse and neglect identification and child abuse and neglect reporting.(f) Unless otherwise specifically provided, the absence of training shall not excuse a mandated reporter from the duties imposed by this article.(g) Public and private organizations are encouraged to provide their volunteers whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children with training in the identification and reporting of child abuse and neglect.SEC. 14.3. Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code is amended to read:11165.7. (a) As used in this article, “mandated reporter” is defined as any of the following:(1) An employee, volunteer, or governing board or body member of a school district, county office of education, charter school, or private school. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(2) An employee, volunteer, or board member of a public or private school, contractor to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, or private school whose duties require contact with or supervision of pupils at that school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education, or private school. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(3) An employee or volunteer assigned to a state special school or diagnostic center operated by the State Department of Education. For purposes of this paragraph, a volunteer is a person who is over 18 years of age and who interacts with pupils outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee.(4) [Reserved](5) [Reserved](6) An administrator of a public or private day camp.(7) An administrator or employee of a public or private youth center, youth recreation program, or youth organization.(8) An administrator, board member, or employee of a public or private organization whose duties require direct contact and supervision of children, including a foster family agency.(9) [Reserved](10) A licensee, an administrator, or an employee of a licensed child daycare facility or community care facility, except those licensed community care facilities exclusively serving adults and seniors.(11) A Head Start program teacher.(12) A licensing worker or licensing evaluator employed by a licensing agency, as defined in Section 11165.11.(13) A public assistance worker.(14) An employee of a childcare institution, including, but not limited to, foster parents, group home personnel, and personnel of residential care facilities.(15) A social worker, probation officer, or parole officer.(16) [Reserved](17) A person who is an administrator or presenter of, or a counselor in, a child abuse prevention program in a public or private school.(18) A district attorney investigator, inspector, or local child support agency caseworker, unless the investigator, inspector, or caseworker is working with an attorney appointed pursuant to Section 317 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to represent a minor.(19) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, who is not otherwise described in this section.(20) A firefighter, except for volunteer firefighters.(21) A physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, dentist, resident, intern, podiatrist, chiropractor, licensed nurse, dental hygienist, optometrist, marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, or any other person who is currently licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.(22) An emergency medical technician I or II, paramedic, or other person certified pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.(23) A psychological assistant registered pursuant to Section 2913 of the Business and Professions Code.(24) A marriage and family therapist trainee, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4980.03 of the Business and Professions Code.(25) An unlicensed associate marriage and family therapist registered under Section 4980.44 of the Business and Professions Code.(26) A state or county public health employee who treats a minor for venereal disease or any other condition.(27) A coroner.(28) A medical examiner or other person who performs autopsies.(29) A commercial film and photographic print or image processor as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “commercial film and photographic print or image processor” means a person who develops exposed photographic film into negatives, slides, or prints, or who makes prints from negatives or slides, or who prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or an image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disk, data storage medium, CD-ROM, computer-generated equipment, or computer-generated image, for compensation. The term includes any employee of that person; it does not include a person who develops film or makes prints or images for a public agency.(30) A child visitation monitor. As used in this article, “child visitation monitor” means a person who, for financial compensation, acts as a monitor of a visit between a child and another person when the monitoring of that visit has been ordered by a court of law.(31) An animal control officer or humane society officer. For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(A) “Animal control officer” means a person employed by a city, county, or city and county for the purpose of enforcing animal control laws or regulations.(B) “Humane society officer” means a person appointed or employed by a public or private entity as a humane officer who is qualified pursuant to Section 14502 or 14503 of the Corporations Code.(32) A clergy member, as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “clergy member” means a priest, minister, rabbi, religious practitioner, or similar functionary of a church, temple, or recognized denomination or organization.(33) Any custodian of records of a clergy member, as specified in this section and subdivision (d) of Section 11166.(34) An employee of any police department, county sheriff’s department, county probation department, or county welfare department.(35) An employee or volunteer of a Court Appointed Special Advocate program, as defined in Rule 5.655 of the California Rules of Court.(36) A custodial officer, as defined in Section 831.5.(37) A person providing services to a minor child under Section 12300 or 12300.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(38) An alcohol and drug counselor. As used in this article, an “alcohol and drug counselor” is a person providing counseling, therapy, or other clinical services for a state licensed or certified drug, alcohol, or drug and alcohol treatment program. However, alcohol or drug abuse, or both alcohol and drug abuse, is not, in and of itself, a sufficient basis for reporting child abuse or neglect.(39) A clinical counselor trainee, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 4999.12 of the Business and Professions Code.(40) An associate professional clinical counselor registered under Section 4999.42 of the Business and Professions Code.(41) An employee or administrator of a public or private postsecondary educational institution, whose duties bring the administrator or employee into contact with children on a regular basis, or who supervises those whose duties bring the administrator or employee into contact with children on a regular basis, as to child abuse or neglect occurring on that institution’s premises or at an official activity of, or program conducted by, the institution. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as altering the lawyer-client privilege as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.(42) An athletic coach, athletic administrator, or athletic director employed by any public or private school that provides any combination of instruction for kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(43) (A) A commercial computer technician as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11166. As used in this article, “commercial computer technician” means a person who works for a company that is in the business of repairing, installing, or otherwise servicing a computer or computer component, including, but not limited to, a computer part, device, memory storage or recording mechanism, auxiliary storage recording or memory capacity, or any other material relating to the operation and maintenance of a computer or computer network system, for a fee. An employer who provides an electronic communications service or a remote computing service to the public shall be deemed to comply with this article if that employer complies with Section 2258A of Title 18 of the United States Code.(B) An employer of a commercial computer technician may implement internal procedures for facilitating reporting consistent with this article. These procedures may direct employees who are mandated reporters under this paragraph to report materials described in subdivision (e) of Section 11166 to an employee who is designated by the employer to receive the reports. An employee who is designated to receive reports under this subparagraph shall be a commercial computer technician for purposes of this article. A commercial computer technician who makes a report to the designated employee pursuant to this subparagraph shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this article and shall be subject to the protections afforded to mandated reporters, including, but not limited to, those protections afforded by Section 11172.(44) Any athletic coach, including, but not limited to, an assistant coach or a graduate assistant involved in coaching, at public or private postsecondary educational institutions.(45) An individual certified by a licensed foster family agency as a certified family home, as defined in Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code.(46) An individual approved as a resource family, as defined in Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(47) A qualified autism service provider, a qualified autism service professional, or a qualified autism service paraprofessional as defined in Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 4999.200) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.(48) A human resource employee of a business subject to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code that employs minors. For purposes of this section, a “human resource employee” is the employee or employees designated by the employer to accept any complaints of misconduct as required by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 12940) of Part 2.8 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(49) An adult person whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of minors in the performance of the minors’ duties in the workplace of a business subject to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code is a mandated reporter of sexual abuse, as defined in Section 11165.1. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to modify or limit the person’s duty to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect when the person is acting in some other capacity that would otherwise make the person a mandated reporter.(50) An individual employed as a talent agent, talent manager, or talent coach, who provides services to a minor.(b) Except as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (35) of subdivision (a), volunteers of public or private organizations whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children are not mandated reporters but are encouraged to obtain training in the identification and reporting of child abuse and neglect and are further encouraged to report known or suspected instances of child abuse or neglect to an agency specified in Section 11165.9.(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d) and paragraph (2), employers are strongly encouraged to provide their employees who are mandated reporters with training in the duties imposed by this article. This training shall include training in child abuse and neglect identification and training in child abuse and neglect reporting. Whether or not employers provide their employees with training in child abuse and neglect identification and reporting, the employers shall provide their employees who are mandated reporters with the statement required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11166.5.(2) Employers subject to paragraphs (48) and (49) of subdivision (a) shall provide their employees who are mandated reporters with training in the duties imposed by this article. This training shall include training in child abuse and neglect identification and training in child abuse and neglect reporting. The training requirement may be met by completing the general online training for mandated reporters offered by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services.(d) Pursuant to Section 44691 of the Education Code, school districts, county offices of education, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the State Department of Education, charter schools, and, commencing July 1, 2026, private schools, shall annually train their employees and persons working on their behalf specified in subdivision (a) in the duties of mandated reporters under the child abuse reporting laws. The training shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, training in child abuse and neglect identification and child abuse and neglect reporting.(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 1596.8662 of the Health and Safety Code, a childcare licensee applicant shall take training in the duties of mandated reporters under the child abuse reporting laws as a condition of licensure, and a childcare administrator or an employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall take training in the duties of mandated reporters during the first 90 days when that administrator or employee is employed by the facility.(2) A person specified in paragraph (1) who becomes a licensee, administrator, or employee of a licensed child daycare facility shall take renewal mandated reporter training every two years following the date on which that person completed the initial mandated reporter training. The training shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, training in child abuse and neglect identification and child abuse and neglect reporting.(f) Unless otherwise specifically provided, the absence of training shall not excuse a mandated reporter from the duties imposed by this article.(g) Public and private organizations are encouraged to provide their volunteers whose duties require direct contact with and supervision of children with training in the identification and reporting of child abuse and neglect.SEC. 15. Section 4.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 32282 of the Education Code proposed by this bill and Senate Bill 98. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 32282 of the Education Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Senate Bill 98, in which case (A) Section 32282 of the Education Code, as amended by Section 2 of Senate Bill 98, shall remain operative only until January 1, 2026, (B) Section 32282 of the Education Code, as added by Section 3 of Senate Bill 98 shall be repealed as of January 1, 2026, (C) Section 4.5 of this bill shall become operative on January 1, 2026, and (D) Section 4 of this bill shall become operative on January 1, 2031.SEC. 16. (a) Section 14.1 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code proposed by both this bill and Senate Bill 402. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, (3) Assembly Bill 653 is not enacted or as enacted does not amend that section, and (4) this bill is enacted after Senate Bill 402, in which case Sections 14, 14.2, and 14.3 of this bill shall not become operative.(b) Section 14.2 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 653. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, (3) Senate Bill 402 is not enacted or as enacted does not amend that section, and (4) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 653, in which case Sections 14, 14.1, and 14.3 of this bill shall not become operative.(c) Section 14.3 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code proposed by this bill, Senate Bill 402, and Assembly Bill 653. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) all three bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) all three bills amend Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Senate Bill 402 and Assembly Bill 653, in which case Sections 14, 14.1, and 14.2 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 17. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.